Arkansas, session 2025, SB400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 2-36-101 is amended to read as follows:
2-36-101. Fair-funding program Funding for livestock shows and fairs —
Requirements — Districts — Definition.
(a) There is created within the Department of Agriculture a fair-
funding program that shall be used to provide fair-funding assistance to
junior livestock shows, county fairs, district fairs, and the Arkansas State
Fair and Livestock Show.
(b) The department shall utilize a historical average of total fair
funding provided by the State of Arkansas to previous fair-funding recipients
in determining an equitable distribution of available funding appropriated by
the General Assembly.
(c)(1)(A)(1) A recipient of fair funding under the fair-funding
program financial assistance provided by the Department of Agriculture under
subsection (a) subsection (b) of this section shall:
(i) Maintain records of expenditures; and
(ii) Submit an annual financial report to the
department and to Arkansas Legislative Audit by the end of each calendar
year.
*CRH199*
04-09-2025 13:41:33 CRH199

As Engrossed: S3/19/25 S3/31/25 S4/9/25 SB400
(B) A recipient of fair funding is subject to a decrease
in future funding if the recipient of fair funding does not:
(i) Submit an annual financial report as required
under subdivision (c)(1)(A)(ii) of this section; or
(ii) Provide provide proof of yearly continuing
education requirements under guidance adopted by the department.
(2) A recipient of fair funding under the fair-funding program
established financial assistance under subsection (a) subsection (b) of this
section is subject to audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(b)(1) The department is authorized to provide financial assistance to
livestock shows and fairs.
(2) Financial assistance provided by the department under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be in accordance with the
department's annual appropriation approved by the General Assembly.
(3) Future fiscal year funding from the state shall not be
distributed to a livestock show or fair until all requirements of this
section are met.
(c)(1) A recipient of financial assistance under subsection (b) of
this section shall:
(A) Submit the following items each fiscal year to the
department and Arkansas Legislative Audit:
(i) An annual financial report for the previous
state fiscal year that includes without limitation an accounting of state
funding utilization;
(ii) An annual operating plan for the upcoming year;
and
(iii) A certificate of good standing from the
Secretary of State; and
(B) Be subject to an audit at any time by Arkansas
Legislative Audit.
(2) A county fair that utilizes county facilities or county
funds for a livestock show or fair shall submit the information in
subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(i)-(iii) of this section to the county quorum court
for review before submitting to the department and to Arkansas Legislative
Audit.
(d) A recipient of financial assistance under this section shall not
04-09-2025 13:41:33 CRH199

As Engrossed: S3/19/25 S3/31/25 S4/9/25 SB400
utilize funding provided by the state to pay association fees, dues, or other
association-related expenses.
(e) A county extension agent shall serve as an ex officio member of a
county fair board.
(f) An exhibitor may participate in one (1) district fair of his or
her choice.
(g) The following counties shall be members of the districts as
follows:
(1) Cleburne County, Fulton County, Izard County, Sharp County,
Stone County, and Van Buren County shall be in the North Central District;
(2) Mississippi County, Craighead County, Greene County, Clay
County, Crittenden County, St. Francis County, Cross County, Poinsett County,
Jackson County, Lawrence County, Randolph County, Lee County, Independence
County, Monroe County, Phillips County, Woodruff County, and White County
shall be in the Northeast District;
(3) Baxter County, Boone County, Carroll County, Madison County,
Marion County, Newton County, and Searcy County shall be in the Northwest
District;
(4) Arkansas County, Ashley County, Bradley County, Calhoun
County, Chicot County, Cleveland County, Dallas County, Drew County, Grant
County, Faulkner County, Lincoln County, Lonoke County, Ouachita County, and
Prairie County shall be in the South Arkansas District;
(5) Clark County, Columbia County, Garland County, Hempstead
County, Hot Spring County, Howard County, Lafayette County, Little River
County, Miller County, Montgomery County, Nevada County, Pike County, Saline
County, Sevier County, and Union County shall be in the Southwest Arkansas
District;
(6) Benton County, Conway County, Crawford County, Franklin
County, Johnson County, Logan County, Perry County, Polk County, Pope County,
Scott County, Sebastian County, Washington County, and Yell County shall be
in the Arkansas-Oklahoma District as provided under § 2-36-307; and
(7) Lee County, Monroe County, and Phillips County shall be in
the Tri-County Fair.
(h)(1) For purposes of financial assistance under this section, the
Four States Fair hosted in Texarkana, Arkansas, shall be treated the same as
a district fair under this section.
04-09-2025 13:41:33 CRH199

As Engrossed: S3/19/25 S3/31/25 S4/9/25 SB400
(2) Residency restrictions on exhibitors shall not apply to this
subsection (h).
(i) As used in this section, "fair" means an event that includes
without limitation livestock shows, consumer and family science,
entertainment, and educational activities and programs.

/s/Irvin





























04-09-2025 13:41:33 CRH199